Missouri, session 2026, HB2494.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 288.060 as enacted by house bill no. 150, ninety-eighth general
assembly, first regular session, and section 288.060 as enacted by house bill no. 163, ninety-
sixth general assembly, first regular session, are repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 288.060, to read as follows:
[288.060. 1. All benefits shall be paid through employment offices in
accordance with such regulations as the division may prescribe.
2. Each eligible insured worker who is totally unemployed in any
week shall be paid for such week a sum equal to his or her weekly benefit
amount.
3. Each eligible insured worker who is partially unemployed in any
week shall be paid for such week a partial benefit. Such partial benefit shall be
an amount equal to the difference between his or her weekly benefit amount
and that part of his or her wages for such week in excess of twenty dollars,
and, if such partial benefit amount is not a multiple of one dollar, such amount
shall be reduced to the nearest lower full dollar amount. For calendar year
2007 and each year thereafter, such partial benefit shall be an amount equal to
the difference between his or her weekly benefit amount and that part of his or
her wages for such week in excess of twenty dollars or twenty percent of his or
her weekly benefit amount, whichever is greater, and, if such partial benefit
amount is not a multiple of one dollar, such amount shall be reduced to the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2494 2
nearest lower full dollar amount. Pay received by an eligible insured worker
who is a member of the organized militia for training or duty authorized by
Section 502(a)(1) of Title 32, United States Code, shall not be considered
wages for the purpose of this subsection.
4. The division shall compute the wage credits for each individual by
crediting him or her with the wages paid to him or her for insured work during
each quarter of his or her base period or twenty-six times his or her weekly
benefit amount, whichever is the lesser. In addition, if a claimant receives
wages in the form of termination pay or severance pay and such payment
appears in a base period established by the filing of an initial claim, the
claimant may, at his or her option, choose to have such payment included in
the calendar quarter in which it was paid or choose to have it prorated equally
among the quarters comprising the base period of the claim. For the purpose
of this section, wages shall be counted as wage credits for any benefit year,
only if such benefit year begins subsequent to the date on which the employing
unit by whom such wages were paid has become an employer. The wage
credits of an individual earned during the period commencing with the end of a
prior base period and ending on the date on which he or she filed an allowed
initial claim shall not be available for benefit purposes in a subsequent benefit
year unless, in addition thereto, such individual has subsequently earned either
wages for insured work in an amount equal to at least five times his or her
current weekly benefit amount or wages in an amount equal to at least ten
times his or her current weekly benefit amount.
5. The duration of benefits payable to any insured worker during any
benefit year shall be limited to:
(1) Twenty weeks if the Missouri average unemployment rate is nine
percent or higher;
(2) Nineteen weeks if the Missouri average unemployment rate is
between eight and one-half percent and nine percent;
(3) Eighteen weeks if the Missouri average unemployment rate is eight
percent up to and including eight and one-half percent;
(4) Seventeen weeks if the Missouri average unemployment rate is
between seven and one-half percent and eight percent;
(5) Sixteen weeks if the Missouri average unemployment rate is seven
percent up to and including seven and one-half percent;
(6) Fifteen weeks if the Missouri average unemployment rate is
between six and one-half percent and seven percent;
(7) Fourteen weeks if the Missouri average unemployment rate is six
percent up to and including six and one-half percent;
(8) Thirteen weeks if the Missouri average unemployment rate is
below six percent.

As used in this subsection, the phrase "Missouri average unemployment rate"
means the average of the seasonally adjusted statewide unemployment rates as
published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor
Statistics, for the time periods of January first through March thirty-first and
July first through September thirtieth. The average of the seasonally adjusted
statewide unemployment rates for the time period of January first through

HB 2494 3
March thirty-first shall be effective on and after July first of each year and
shall be effective through December thirty-first. The average of the seasonally
adjusted statewide unemployment rates for the time period of July first
through September thirtieth shall be effective on and after January first of each
year and shall be effective through June thirtieth; and
(9) The provisions of this subsection shall become effective January 1,
2016.
6. In the event that benefits are due a deceased person and no petition
has been filed for the probate of the will or for the administration of the estate
of such person within thirty days after his or her death, the division may by
regulation provide for the payment of such benefits to such person or persons
as the division finds entitled thereto and every such payment shall be a valid
payment to the same extent as if made to the legal representatives of the
deceased.
7. The division is authorized to cancel any benefit warrant remaining
outstanding and unpaid one year after the date of its issuance and there shall be
no liability for the payment of any such benefit warrant thereafter.
8. The division may establish an electronic funds transfer system to
transfer directly to claimants' accounts in financial institutions benefits payable
to them pursuant to this chapter. To receive benefits by electronic funds
transfer, a claimant shall satisfactorily complete a direct deposit application
form authorizing the division to deposit benefit payments into a designated
checking or savings account. Any electronic funds transfer system created
pursuant to this subsection shall be administered in accordance with
regulations prescribed by the division.
9. The division may issue a benefit warrant covering more than one
week of benefits.
10. Prior to January 1, 2005, the division shall institute procedures
including, but not limited to, name, date of birth, and Social Security
verification matches for remote claims filing via the use of telephone or the
internet in accordance with such regulations as the division shall prescribe. At
a minimum, the division shall verify the Social Security number and date of
birth when an individual claimant initially files for unemployment insurance
benefits. If verification information does not match what is on file in division
databases to what the individual is stating, the division shall require the
100 claimant to submit a division-approved form requesting an affidavit of
101 eligibility prior to the payment of additional future benefits. The division of
102 employment security shall cross-check unemployment compensation
103 applicants and recipients with Social Security Administration data
104 maintained by the federal government at least weekly. The division of
105 employment security shall cross-check at least monthly unemployment
106 compensation applicants and recipients with department of revenue drivers
107 license databases.]
288.060. 1. All benefits shall be paid through employment offices in accordance with
such regulations as the division may prescribe.

HB 2494 4
2. Each eligible insured worker who is totally unemployed in any week shall be paid
for such week a sum equal to his or her weekly benefit amount.
3. Each eligible insured worker who is partially unemployed in any week shall be
paid for such week a partial benefit. Such partial benefit shall be an amount equal to the
difference between his or her weekly benefit amount and that part of his or her wages for such
week in excess of twenty dollars, and, if such partial benefit amount is not a multiple of one
dollar, such amount shall be reduced to the nearest lower full dollar amount. For calendar
year 2007 and each year thereafter, such partial benefit shall be an amount equal to the
difference between his or her weekly benefit amount and that part of his or her wages for such
week in excess of twenty dollars or twenty percent of his or her weekly benefit amount,
whichever is greater, and, if such partial benefit amount is not a multiple of one dollar, such
amount shall be reduced to the nearest lower full dollar amount. Termination pay, severance
pay, or pay received by an eligible insured worker who is a member of the organized militia
for training or duty authorized by [Section 502(a)(1) of Title 32, United States Code,] 32
U.S.C. Section 502(a)(1) shall not be considered wages for the purpose of this subsection.
4. The division shall compute the wage credits for each individual by crediting him or
her with the wages paid to him or her for insured work during each quarter of his or her base
period or twenty-six times his or her weekly benefit amount, whichever is the lesser. In
addition, if a claimant receives wages in the form of termination pay or severance pay and
such payment appears in a base period established by the filing of an initial claim, the
claimant may, at his or her option, choose to have such payment included in the calendar
quarter in which it was paid or choose to have it prorated equally among the quarters
comprising the base period of the claim. The maximum total amount of benefits payable to
any insured worker during any benefit year shall not exceed [twenty] twenty-six times his or
her weekly benefit amount, or thirty-three and one-third percent of his or her wage credits,
whichever is the lesser. For the purpose of this section, wages shall be counted as wage
credits for any benefit year, only if such benefit year begins subsequent to the date on which
the employing unit by whom such wages were paid has become an employer. The wage
credits of an individual earned during the period commencing with the end of a prior base
period and ending on the date on which he or she filed an allowed initial claim shall not be
available for benefit purposes in a subsequent benefit year unless, in addition thereto, such
individual has subsequently earned either wages for insured work in an amount equal to at
least five times his or her current weekly benefit amount or wages in an amount equal to at
least ten times his or her current weekly benefit amount.
5. In the event that benefits are due a deceased person and no petition has been filed
for the probate of the will or for the administration of the estate of such person within thirty
days after his or her death, the division may by regulation provide for the payment of such

HB 2494 5
benefits to such person or persons as the division finds entitled thereto and every such
payment shall be a valid payment to the same extent as if made to the legal representatives of
the deceased.
6. The division is authorized to cancel any benefit warrant remaining outstanding and
unpaid one year after the date of its issuance and there shall be no liability for the payment of
any such benefit warrant thereafter.
7. The division may establish an electronic funds transfer system to transfer directly
to claimants' accounts in financial institutions benefits payable to them pursuant to this
chapter. To receive benefits by electronic funds transfer, a claimant shall satisfactorily
complete a direct deposit application form authorizing the division to deposit benefit
payments into a designated checking or savings account. Any electronic funds transfer
system created pursuant to this subsection shall be administered in accordance with
regulations prescribed by the division.
8. The division may issue a benefit warrant covering more than one week of benefits.
9. Prior to January 1, 2005, the division shall institute procedures including, but not
limited to, name, date of birth, and Social Security verification matches for remote claims
filing via the use of telephone or the internet in accordance with such regulations as the
division shall prescribe. At a minimum, the division shall verify the Social Security number
and date of birth when an individual claimant initially files for unemployment insurance
benefits. If verification information does not match what is on file in division databases to
what the individual is stating, the division shall require the claimant to submit a division-
approved form requesting an affidavit of eligibility prior to the payment of additional future
benefits. The division of employment security shall cross-check unemployment
compensation applicants and recipients with Social Security Administration data
maintained by the federal government at least weekly. The division of employment
security shall cross-check at least monthly unemployment compensation applicants and
recipients with department of revenue drivers license databases.
✔